Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 13 Facilities in Public Buildings for Physically Handicapped

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of § 302 of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 USCS § 12182), Prohibiting Discrimination on Basis of Disability by Owners or Operators of Places of Public Accommodation, 136 ALR Fed 1.